Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2710
Sales without permit; penalty; limitation on claim.

Any person selling a current tractor model of one hundred or more horsepower for use in
the State of Nebraska without a permit issued by the department for such tractor
model shall be required to repurchase any such tractor model sold in Nebraska
for which a permit has not been issued. A
claim by a purchaser under this section shall be brought within two years
from the date of purchase.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 45, p. 1397;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-345;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 10, p. 1489;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 10;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB907, § 5.